Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 291.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Tax amount. new text begin (a) new text end The tax imposed must be computed by applying to the Minnesota taxable estate the following schedule of rates and then the resulting amount multiplied by a fraction, not greater than one, the numerator of which is the value of the Minnesota gross estate plus the value of gifts under section 291.016, subdivision 2, clause (3), with a Minnesota situs, and the denominator of which is the federal gross estate plus the value of gifts under section 291.016, subdivision 2, clause (3): deleted text begin (a) For estates of decedents dying in 2017: deleted text end deleted text begin Amount of Minnesota Taxable Estate deleted text end deleted text begin Rate of Tax deleted text end deleted text begin Not over $5,100,000 deleted text end deleted text begin 12 percent deleted text end deleted text begin Over $5,100,000 but not over $7,100,000 deleted text end deleted text begin $612,000 plus 12.8 percent of the excess over $5,100,000 deleted text end deleted text begin Over $7,100,000 but not over $8,100,000 deleted text end deleted text begin $868,000 plus 13.6 percent of the excess over $7,100,000 deleted text end deleted text begin Over $8,100,000 but not over $9,100,000 deleted text end deleted text begin $1,004,000 plus 14.4 percent of the excess over $8,100,000 deleted text end deleted text begin Over $9,100,000 but not over $10,100,000 deleted text end deleted text begin $1,148,000 plus 15.2 percent of the excess over $9,100,000 deleted text end deleted text begin Over $10,100,000 deleted text end deleted text begin $1,300,000 plus 16 percent of the excess over $10,100,000 deleted text end deleted text begin (b) For estates of decedents dying in 2018 and thereafter: deleted text end Amount of Minnesota Taxable Estate Rate of Tax Not over $7,100,000 13 percent Over $7,100,000 but not over $8,100,000 $923,000 plus 13.6 percent of the excess over $7,100,000 Over $8,100,000 but not over $9,100,000 $1,059,000 plus 14.4 percent of the excess over $8,100,000 Over $9,100,000 but not over $10,100,000 $1,203,000 plus 15.2 percent of the excess over $9,100,000 Over $10,100,000 $1,355,000 plus 16 percent of the excess over $10,100,000 new text begin (b) Beginning July 1, 2025, and each July 1 thereafter through June 30, 2034, the commissioner shall: new text end new text begin (1) reduce the rates in paragraph (a) by 1.6 percentage points until each rate equals zero. If a reduction reduces the rate to less than zero, the rate for that bracket is deemed to be zero; and new text end new text begin (2) reduce the amounts added to the rate brackets according to the adjustment under clause (1) until each amount is reduced to zero. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for estates of decedents dying after June 30, 2025. new text end